Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 55. Housing, Public Buildings, Urban Renewal, and Regional Housing Authorities.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1986, under § 3, ch. 103, SLA 1986, and AS

01.05.031

, “Alaska State Building Authority” was substituted for “Alaska State Housing Authority” throughout this chapter. In 1989, under § 2, ch. 11, SLA 1989 and AS

01.05.031

, “Alaska State Housing Authority” was substituted for “Alaska State Building Authority” throughout this chapter.

In 1992, under ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, effective July 1, 1992, the Alaska State Housing Authority was abolished and the duties assigned to the former Alaska State Housing Authority under this chapter were transferred to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation (AS 18.56).

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska housing finance corporation, see 15 AAC 150.